Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 28. Plant Pollination Fund.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Plant Pollination Fund” was substituted for “Plant Pollination Advisory Board” in the chapter heading to conform to changes made by Acts 2011, cc. 594 and 681.

§ 3.2-2800.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Beekeeper”
means any person who keeps and manages bees for profit, and shall include those growers who keep bees for pollinating crops.

“Cross pollination”
means the transfer of pollen from the anthers of blossoms to the stigmas of other blossoms of the same crops or a variety of the same crop.

“Pollination contractor”
means any person who contracts to supply a means of cross pollinating the blossoms of any specified plant.

“Producer”
means any person engaged in the business of raising crops that benefit from cross pollination by honeybees or other pollinating insects.

History.

1977, c. 452, § 3.1-610.23; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 594, 681.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 594 and 681 are identical, and deleted the definitions for “Regular meeting” and “Special meeting.”

§§ 3.2-2801 through 3.2-2804.
Repealed by Acts 2011, cc. 594 and 681, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

3.2-2801

through 3.2-2804, pertaining to the Plant Pollination Advisory Board, were derived from 1977, c. 452, §§ 3.1-610.22, 3.1-610.24, 3.1-610.25, 3.1-610.26; 1978, c. 267; 1992, c. 121; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2805.
Powers and duties of Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall have the following powers and duties:

To receive and dispense funds;

To develop and administer a beekeeper assistance program that is designed to assist Virginia beekeepers in maintaining healthy, productive colonies;

To enter into contracts for the purpose of developing new or improved markets or marketing methods for bees and bee products and pollination services;

To contract for scientific research services and to contract to develop improved pollinating behavior in honeybees and other pollinating insects;

To contract for rearing numbers of improved queen bees sufficient for distribution or sale to beekeepers;

To enter into agreements with any local, state or national organization or agency engaged in education for the purpose of disseminating information on pollinators and pollination of crops;

To rent or purchase office and laboratory space and land as necessary to carry out its duties;

To appoint employees, full- or part-time, and to fix their compensation, if any, in accord with the provisions of the Virginia Personnel Act, (§

2.2-2900

et seq.);

To encourage research, education, methods of improvement in apicultural practices, and promotion projects and the award of funds for such projects as deemed necessary or advisable to accomplish the objectives set forth in this chapter; and

To report to the Board in the manner and at such times as the Board may prescribe, regarding the receipt and expenditure of funds. The Commissioner shall ensure that funds made available to the Plant Pollination Fund are expended only for the purposes authorized by this chapter.

History.

1977, c. 452, §§ 3.1-610.25, 3.1-610.26:1; 1978, c. 267; 1992, c. 121; 2004, c. 201; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 594, 681.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 594 and 681 are identical, and in subdivision 2, deleted “in consultation with the Plant Pollination Advisory Board” following “administer”; added subdivision 9 and made a related change; and redesignated former subdivision 9 as subdivision 10, and therein deleted “and the Plant Pollination Advisory Board’s policies, programs, and activities” from the end of the first sentence, and substituted “The Commissioner” for “The Plant Pollination Advisory Board” in the last sentence.

§ 3.2-2806.
Plant Pollination Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Plant Pollination Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys derived from appropriations from the general fund of the state treasury, grants of private or government money designated for specified activities authorized pursuant to this chapter; fees for services rendered pursuant to this chapter; payment for products, equipment, or material or any other thing supplied by the Commissioner; payment for educational publications, materials or supplies provided by the Commissioner; and grants, bequests and donations shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. All funds collected for or received by the Commissioner shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. The Commissioner is further authorized to accept materials, supplies, property, land and personal services contributed from any source. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the administration of this chapter. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the Commissioner on warrants issued by the Comptroller.

History.

1977, c. 452, § 3.1-610.27; 1978, c. 267; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 594, 681.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 594 and 681 are identical, and deleted “upon written request signed by a duly authorized officer of the Plant Pollination Advisory Board” from the end of the last sentence.

§ 3.2-2807.
Repealed by Acts 2011, cc. 594 and 681, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

3.2-2807

, pertaining to the administration of the Plant Polination Fund, was derived from Acts 1977, c. 452, § 3.1-610.28; 1978, c. 267; 2008, c. 860.